Washington statutes.
RCW 43.331.900

Referral to people—Spending restriction—Ballot title—2010 1st sp.s. c 35 ss 101 through 203 and 401 through 405.

(1) The secretary of state shall submit sections 101 through 203 and 401 through 405 of this act to the people for their adoption and ratification, or rejection, at the next general election to be held in this state, in accordance with Article II, section 1 and Article VIII, section 3 of the state Constitution and the laws adopted to facilitate their operation.

(2) If the people ratify this act as specified under subsection (1) of this section, revenues generated shall be spent as detailed in this act.

(3) Pursuant to *RCW 29A.72.050(6), the statement of subject and concise description for the ballot title shall read: "The legislature has passed Engrossed House Bill No. 2561 (this act), concerning job creation through energy efficiency projects in school buildings. This bill would promote job creation by authorizing bonds to construct energy efficiency savings improvements to schools, including higher education buildings."

[ 2010 1st sp.s. c 35 s 501.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 29A.72.050 was amended by 2022 c 114 s 3, changing subsection (6) to subsection (7).

Contingent effective date—2010 1st sp.s. c 35: See note following RCW 43.331.040.